Colorado, session 2026A, HB1378.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 27-50-305,
27-80-120, and 27-80-126.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 27-50-101, amend (6);
and add (17.3) as follows:
27-50-101. Definitions.
As used in this article 50, unless the context otherwise requires:
(6) "Behavioral health provider" means a recovery community
organization, as defined in section 27-80-126, a recovery support services
organization, as defined in section 27-60-108, or a licensed organization or
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

professional providing diagnostic, therapeutic, or psychological services for
behavioral health conditions. Behavioral health providers include a
residential child care facility, as defined in section 26-6-903 (29), and a
federally qualified health center.
(17.3) "RECOVERY COMMUNITY ORGANIZATION" MEANS AN
INDEPENDENT, NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION LED AND GOVERNED BY
REPRESENTATIVES OF LOCAL COMMUNITIES OF RECOVERY THAT ORGANIZE
RECOVERY-FOCUSED POLICY ADVOCACY ACTIVITIES, CARRY OUT
RECOVERY-FOCUSED COMMUNITY EDUCATION AND OUTREACH PROGRAMS,
OR PROVIDE PEER-RUN RECOVERY SUPPORT SERVICES.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 27-50-105, amend
(1)(gg); and repeal (1)(ee) and (1)(ii) as follows:
27-50-105. Administration of behavioral health programs - state
plan - sole mental health authority - gifts, grants, or donations - repeal.
(1) The BHA shall administer and provide the following behavioral
health programs and services:
(ee) The building substance use disorder treatment capacity in
underserved communities grant program created pursuant to section
27-80-120;
(gg) (I) The high-risk families cash fund created pursuant to section
27-80-123.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (1)(gg) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026.
(ii) The recovery support services grant program created pursuant
to section 27-80-126;
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 27-60-110, amend (3)
as follows:
27-60-110. Behavioral health-care services for rural and
agricultural communities - vouchers - contract - appropriation.
(3) For the 2021-22 2026-27 fiscal year, and each fiscal year
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1378

thereafter, the general assembly shall MAY annually appropriate fifty
thousand dollars MONEY for the contract awarded pursuant to subsection (1)
of this section.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 27-60-301, amend (3)
as follows:
27-60-301. Definitions.
As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:
(3) "Behavioral health provider" means a recovery community
organization, as defined in section 27-80-126 SECTION 27-50-101, a
recovery support services organization, as defined in section 27-60-108, or
a licensed organization or professional that provides diagnostic, therapeutic,
or psychological services for behavioral health conditions. Behavioral
health providers include a residential child care facility, as defined in
section 26-6-903 (29), and a federally qualified health center, as defined in
the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395x (aa)(4).
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 27-80-123, add (8) and
(9) as follows:
27-80-123. High-risk families cash fund - creation - services
provided - report - definition - repeal.
(8) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER ALL UNEXPENDED AND
UNENCUMBERED MONEY IN THE FUND ON JUNE 30, 2026, TO THE GENERAL
FUND.
(9) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026.
SECTION 7. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, to implement this
act, the appropriations made in the annual general appropriation act for the
2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of human services for use by the
behavioral health administration for behavioral health safety net services is
decreased by $3,500,000, which amount consists of $500,000 from the
general fund and $3,000,000 from the marijuana tax cash fund created in
section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1378

(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not require a reduction of an
appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year if:
(a) The general fund appropriation made in the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of
human services for use by the behavioral health administration for
behavioral health safety net services is less than the amount of the
adjustment required in subsection (1) of this section;
(b) The cash funds appropriation from the marijuana tax cash fund
created in section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., made in the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of
human services for use by the behavioral health administration for
behavioral health safety net services is less than the amount of the
adjustment required in subsection (1) of this section; or
(c) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal
year does not include an appropriation to the department of human services
for use by the behavioral health administration for behavioral health safety
net services.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, to
implement this act, the general fund appropriation made in the annual
general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department
of human services for use by the behavioral health administration for the
recovery support services grant program is decreased by $1,600,805, and
the related FTE is decreased by 1.0 FTE.
(4) (a) If the general fund appropriation made in the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of
human services for use by the behavioral health administration for the
recovery support services grant program is an amount less than the amount
of the adjustment required in subsection (3) of this section, the general fund
appropriation is decreased to $0.
(b) If the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year does not include an appropriation to the department of human
services for use by the behavioral health administration for the recovery
support services grant program, then subsection (3) of this section does not
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1378

require a reduction of an appropriation in the annual general appropriation
act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year.
SECTION 8. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
except that section 7 of this act takes effect only if the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year becomes law, in which
case section 7 takes effect upon the effective date of this act or of the annual
general appropriation act for state fiscal year 2026-27, whichever is later.
SECTION 9. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1378

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1378